Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3708
Motor club service contract, defined.

Motor club service contract shall mean any written agreement whereby any club, for a consideration, promises to render, furnish, or procure for any member a motor club service.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 8.